Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Additional State Retirement and Disability Benefits.
§ 25-11-106.
Counties responsible for employer contributions on direct payments to constables covered under Public Employees’ Retirement System; constables responsible for employee contributions; county required to withhold percentage of gross fee income as estimated retirement contributions where constable responsible for both employer and employee contributions on net fee income; constables must make delinquent payments or elect not to and forfeit service credit.

Any constable in office as of July 1, 2005, whose position is covered in the Public Employees’ Retirement System by virtue of a plan submitted and approved under Section 25-11-105(f) will remain a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(i) The county is responsible for employer contributions on all direct payments to the constable from the county.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the constable is responsible for the employee contributions on direct payments to the constable from the county and both the employer and employee share of contributions on his or her net fee income.

For contributions required for calendar year 2014 and any calendar year thereafter, the county may elect, by majority vote of the board of supervisors spread upon its minutes, to be responsible for the employer share of contributions on the net fee income of its constables. If the county elects to be responsible for employer contributions under this provision, the election shall be irrevocable until the board of supervisors takes office for the next succeeding term of office at which time the board may elect whether to continue the election. Notice shall be given to the executive director of any election made under this subparagraph (iii) within five (5) days after the election is made.

From and after January 1, 2006, in cases in which the constable is responsible for both the employer and employee contributions on net fee income, the county shall withhold from fee income due to the constable a percentage amount, as set by the board, of the gross fee income paid to the constable as estimated retirement contributions and shall remit that amount to the system. Not later than the date on which the annual report of earnings is due to be filed as provided in Section 7-3-45, the constable shall submit to the system a copy of the earnings record and make complete payment of any required contributions on net earnings from his or her office, but not less than the contributions due on the governmental treasuries paid by the county in the prior calendar year. If the constable fails to make full payment of contributions at the time required, the system shall certify the delinquency to the county and the county shall withhold any and all payments and fees due to the constable until such time as his or her retirement contributions are fully reported and made.

Any current or former constable for whom appropriate employer and employee contributions and interest on all fees and county income from covered service before January 1, 2006, have not been made shall do one (1) of the following:

Make the required payments or enter into an irrevocable agreement by not later than December 31, 2005, to make the payments for all calendar years before January 1, 2006. Contributions and interest due and owing for covered services before January 1, 2006, must be received by the system not later than April 15, 2007, or such date as set forth in the payment schedule mutually adopted by the member and the system.

Elect, before December 31, 2005, not to pay delinquent employee and employer contributions and applicable interest for service as a constable before January 1, 2006. By making this election, the current or former constable shall irrevocably forfeit that service credit so as to be relieved of the liability for additional employer and employee contributions and applicable interest.

Where a current or former constable fails to make required contributions as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section, or where a current or former constable irrevocably elects to forfeit service credit as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, all employer and employee contributions previously paid on that service shall be credited to the county as the reporting entity to be distributed as appropriate between the county and the constable or former constable. No further contributions shall be due on that past service and any credit on that past service shall be removed from the member’s record and may not be reinstated at any time in the future.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2013.

§ 25-11-106.1.
Counties responsible for employer contributions on direct payments to chancery or circuit clerks covered under Public Employees’ Retirement System; chancery or circuit clerks responsible for employee contributions; chancery or circuit clerk delinquent contributions; irrevocable forfeiture of service credit for any period for which appropriate employee and employer contributions not made.

Any chancery or circuit clerk in office as of January 1, 2011, whose position is covered in the Public Employees’ Retirement System by virtue of a plan submitted and approved under Section 25-11-105(f) will remain a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(i) The county is responsible for employer contributions on net income attributable to direct treasury or county payroll income paid to the chancery or circuit clerk from the county.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), the chancery or circuit clerk is responsible for the employee contributions on net income attributable to direct treasury or county payroll income paid to the clerk and both the employee and employer share of contributions on the proportionate share of net income attributable to fees.

For contributions required for calendar year 2011 and any calendar year thereafter, the county may elect, by majority vote of the board of supervisors spread upon its minutes, to be responsible for the employer share of contributions on the proportionate share of net income of the chancery and circuit clerk attributable to fees. If the county elects to be responsible for employer contributions under this provision, the election shall be irrevocable until the board of supervisors takes office for the next succeeding term of office at which time the board may elect whether to continue the election. Notice shall be given to the executive director of any election made under this subparagraph (iii) within five (5) days after the election is made.

Not later than the date on which the annual report of earnings is due to be filed with the Office of the State Auditor, the chancery or circuit clerk shall submit to the system a copy of the earnings record and make complete payment of required contributions on net income from his or her office; however, in no event shall the contributions be less than the contributions due on the governmental treasuries paid by the county in the prior calendar year.

If the chancery or circuit clerk fails to make full payment of contributions as required for calendar year 2010 or any calendar year thereafter, the system shall certify the delinquency to the county and the county shall withhold any and all payments and fees, including accrued interest, due to the chancery or circuit clerk in a manner as prescribed by board regulations until such time as the total amount of his or her delinquent contributions are withheld and pay the amount so withheld to the system.

Any current or former chancery or circuit clerk for whom appropriate employee and employer contributions and interest on all fees and county income from covered service before January 1, 2010, have not been made shall do one (1) of the following:

Pay to the system the required contributions and interest by not later than December 31, 2011. Failure to pay the required contributions and interest by December 31, 2011, shall constitute an irrevocable election to forfeit service credit for any period for which contributions are delinquent. Upon such forfeiture, the chancery or circuit clerk shall be relieved of the liability for additional employee and employer contributions and applicable interest for covered service before January 1, 2010.

Elect, before December 31, 2011, not to pay delinquent employee and employer contributions and applicable interest for service as a chancery or circuit clerk before January 1, 2010. By making this election, the current or former chancery or circuit clerk shall irrevocably forfeit service credit for any period for which contributions are delinquent and shall not be liable for employee and employer contributions and applicable interest for covered service before January 1, 2010.

If a current or former chancery or circuit clerk fails to make required contributions as provided in subsection (3)(a) of this section or elects to forfeit service credit as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section, all employee and employer contributions previously paid on that service shall be credited to the county as the reporting entity to be distributed as appropriate between the county and the chancery or circuit clerk or former chancery or circuit clerk. No further contributions shall be due on that past service and any credit on that past service shall be removed from the member’s record and may not be reinstated at any time in the future.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 402, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011).

§ 25-11-107.
Civilian employees of Mississippi National Guard as a coverage group.

The board of trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System is hereby authorized and empowered to include as a coverage group under this article those regular full-time civilian employees of the Mississippi National Guard whose entire salary is paid on certification out of allotted federal funds, provided funds are made available from the federal government or state appropriations to pay employers’ contributions on the salaries of such employees. In event the employers’ contributions on such salaries should fail to be paid in full to the public employees’ retirement system, the board of trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be prevented from allowing service credit for any such period of delinquency and such retirants would be allowed only such service credits as had accrued up to the time of any such delinquency; but members who remain in the system with their service credits suspended during any such period of delinquency may obtain full service credit upon the payment of all employers’ contributions due the retirement system for the entire coverage group.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-13.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 546; Laws, 1962, ch. 578, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 25-11-109.
Creditable service.

Under such rules and regulations as the board of trustees shall adopt, each person who becomes a member of this retirement system, as provided in Section 25-11-105, on or before July 1, 1953, or who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and contributes to the system for a minimum period of four (4) years, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and contributes to the system for a minimum period of eight (8) years, shall receive credit for all state service rendered before February 1, 1953. To receive that credit, the member shall file a detailed statement of all services as an employee rendered by him in the state service before February 1, 1953. For any member who joined the system after July 1, 1953, and before July 1, 2007, any creditable service for which the member is not required to make contributions shall not be credited to the member until the member has contributed to the system for a minimum period of at least four (4) years. For any member who joined the system on or after July 1, 2007, any creditable service for which the member is not required to make contributions shall not be credited to the member until the member has contributed to the system for a minimum period of at least eight (8) years.

(i) In the computation of creditable service for service rendered before July 1, 2017, under the provisions of this article, the total months of accumulative service during any fiscal year shall be calculated in accordance with the schedule as follows: ten (10) or more months of creditable service during any fiscal year shall constitute a year of creditable service; seven (7) months to nine (9) months inclusive, three-quarters (3/4) of a year of creditable service; four (4) months to six (6) months inclusive, one-half (1/2) year of creditable service; one (1) month to three (3) months inclusive, one-quarter (1/4) of a year of creditable service.

In the computation of creditable service rendered on or after July 1, 2017, under the provisions of this article, service credit shall be awarded in monthly increments in a manner prescribed by regulations of the board.

In no case shall credit be allowed for any period of absence without compensation except for disability while in receipt of a disability retirement allowance, nor shall less than fifteen (15) days of service in any month, or service less than the equivalent of one-half (1/2) of the normal working load for the position and less than one-half (1/2) of the normal compensation for the position in any month, constitute a month of creditable service, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be creditable for all services rendered in any one (1) fiscal year; however, for a school employee, substantial completion of the legal school term when and where the service was rendered shall constitute a year of service credit. Any state or local elected official shall be deemed a full-time employee for the purpose of creditable service. However, an appointed or elected official compensated on a per diem basis only shall not be allowed creditable service for terms of office.

In the computation of any retirement allowance or any annuity or benefits provided in this article, any fractional period of service of less than one (1) year shall be taken into account and a proportionate amount of such retirement allowance, annuity or benefit shall be granted for any such fractional period of service.

(i) In the computation of unused leave for creditable service authorized in Section 25-11-103, the following shall govern for members who retire before July 1, 2017: twenty-one (21) days of unused leave shall constitute one (1) month of creditable service and in no case shall credit be allowed for any period of unused leave of less than fifteen (15) days. The number of months of unused leave shall determine the number of quarters or years of creditable service in accordance with the above schedule for membership and prior service.

In the computation of unused leave for creditable service authorized in Section 25-11-103, the following shall govern for members who retire on or after July 1, 2017: creditable service for unused leave shall be calculated in monthly increments in which one (1) month of service credit shall be awarded for each twenty-one (21) days of unused leave, except that the first fifteen (15) to fifty-seven (57) days of leave shall constitute three (3) months of service for those who became a member of the system before July 1, 2017.

In order for the member to receive creditable service for the number of days of unused leave under this paragraph, the system must receive certification from the governing authority.

For the purposes of this subsection, members of the system who retire on or after July 1, 2010, shall receive credit for one-half (1/2) day of leave for each full year of membership service accrued after June 30, 2010. The amount of leave received by a member under this paragraph shall be added to the lawfully credited unused leave for which creditable service is provided under Section 25-11-103(i).

For the purpose of this subsection, for members of the system who are elected officers and who retire on or after July 1, 1987, the following shall govern:

For service before July 1, 1984, the members shall receive credit for leave (combined personal and major medical) for service as an elected official before that date at the rate of thirty (30) days per year.

For service on and after July 1, 1984, the member shall receive credit for personal and major medical leave beginning July 1, 1984, at the rates authorized in Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95, computed as a full-time employee.

If a member is employed in a covered nonelected position and a covered elected position simultaneously, that member may not receive service credit for accumulated unused leave for both positions at retirement for the period during which the member was dually employed. During the period during which the member is dually employed, the member shall only receive credit for leave as provided for in this paragraph for an elected official.

Subject to the above restrictions and to such other rules and regulations as the board may adopt, the board shall verify, as soon as practicable after the filing of such statements of service, the services therein claimed.

Upon verification of the statement of prior service, the board shall issue a prior service certificate certifying to each member the length of prior service for which credit shall have been allowed on the basis of his statement of service. So long as membership continues, a prior service certificate shall be final and conclusive for retirement purposes as to such service, provided that any member may within five (5) years from the date of issuance or modification of such certificate request the board of trustees to modify or correct his prior service certificate. Any modification or correction authorized shall only apply prospectively.

When membership ceases, such prior service certificates shall become void. Should the employee again become a member, he shall enter the system as an employee not entitled to prior service credit except as provided in Sections 25-11-105(I), 25-11-113 and 25-11-117.

Creditable service at retirement, on which the retirement allowance of a member shall be based, shall consist of the membership service rendered by him since he last became a member, and also, if he has a prior service certificate that is in full force and effect, the amount of the service certified on his prior service certificate.

Any member who served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, who served in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health Service before 1972 or who served in maritime service during periods of hostility in World War II, shall be entitled to creditable service at no cost for his service on active duty in the Armed Forces, in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health Service before 1972 or in such maritime service, provided he entered state service after his discharge from the Armed Forces or entered state service after he completed such maritime service. The maximum period for such creditable service for all military service as defined in this subsection (6) shall not exceed four (4) years unless positive proof can be furnished by such person that he was retained in the Armed Forces during World War II or in maritime service during World War II by causes beyond his control and without opportunity of discharge. The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service or maritime service records showing dates of entrance into active duty service and the date of discharge. From and after July 1, 1993, no creditable service shall be granted for any military service or maritime service to a member who qualifies for a retirement allowance in another public retirement system administered by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System based, in whole or in part, on such military or maritime service. In no case shall the member receive creditable service if the member received a dishonorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States.

Any member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System whose membership service is interrupted as a result of qualified military service within the meaning of Section 414(u)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, and who has received the maximum service credit available under subsection (6) of this section, shall receive creditable service for the period of qualified military service that does not qualify as creditable service under subsection (6) of this section upon reentering membership service in an amount not to exceed five (5) years if:

The member pays the contributions he would have made to the retirement system if he had remained in membership service for the period of qualified military service based upon his salary at the time his membership service was interrupted;

The member returns to membership service within ninety (90) days of the end of his qualified military service; and

The employer at the time the member’s service was interrupted and to which employment the member returns pays the contributions it would have made into the retirement system for such period based on the member’s salary at the time the service was interrupted.

The payments required to be made in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection may be made over a period beginning with the date of return to membership service and not exceeding three (3) times the member’s qualified military service; however, in no event shall such period exceed five (5) years.

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service showing dates of entrance into qualified service and the date of discharge as well as proof that the member has returned to active employment within the time specified.

Any member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and who has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, shall be entitled to receive a maximum of five (5) years’ creditable service for service rendered in another state as a public employee of such other state, or a political subdivision, public education system or other governmental instrumentality thereof, or service rendered as a teacher in American overseas dependent schools conducted by the Armed Forces of the United States for children of citizens of the United States residing in areas outside the continental United States, provided that:

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of such services from the state, public education system, political subdivision or retirement system of the state where the services were performed or the governing entity of the American overseas dependent school where the services were performed; and

The member is not receiving or will not be entitled to receive from the public retirement system of the other state or from any other retirement plan, including optional retirement plans, sponsored by the employer, a retirement allowance including such services; and

The member shall pay to the retirement system on the date he or she is eligible for credit for such out-of-state service or at any time thereafter before the date of retirement the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year of out-of-state creditable service. The provisions of this subsection are subject to the limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated under that section.

Any member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has at least four (4) years of membership service credit, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and has at least eight (8) years of membership service credit, and who receives, or has received, professional leave without compensation for professional purposes directly related to the employment in state service shall receive creditable service for the period of professional leave without compensation provided:

The professional leave is performed with a public institution or public agency of this state, or another state or federal agency;

The employer approves the professional leave showing the reason for granting the leave and makes a determination that the professional leave will benefit the employee and employer;

Such professional leave shall not exceed two (2) years during any ten-year period of state service;

The employee shall serve the employer on a full-time basis for a period of time equivalent to the professional leave period granted immediately following the termination of the leave period;

The contributing member shall pay to the retirement system the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year of professional leave. The provisions of this subsection are subject to the regulations of the Internal Revenue Code limitations;

Such other rules and regulations consistent herewith as the board may adopt and in case of question, the board shall have final power to decide the questions.

Any actively contributing member participating in the School Administrator Sabbatical Program established in Section 37-9-77 shall qualify for continued participation under this subsection (9).

Any member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and has at least four (4) years of credited membership service, or who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, and has at least eight (8) years of credited membership service, shall be entitled to receive a maximum of ten (10) years creditable service for:

Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, that does not participate in the Public Employees’ Retirement System; or

Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, that participates in the Public Employees’ Retirement System but did not elect retroactive coverage; or

Any service rendered as an employee of any political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality thereof, for which coverage of the employee’s position was or is excluded; provided that the member pays into the retirement system the actuarial cost as determined by the actuary for each year, or portion thereof, of such service. After a member has made full payment to the retirement system for all or any part of such service, the member shall receive creditable service for the period of such service for which full payment has been made to the retirement system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-14; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 14; Laws, 1960, ch. 454; Laws, 1971, ch. 478, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 450, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 481, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 481; Laws, 1987, ch. 440; Laws, 1990, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 3, 1995, ch. 624, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 545, § 28; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 1, 1st Ex Sess § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-11-110.
Inclusion of deceased member’s period of qualified military service for vesting purposes; survivors entitled to certain additional benefits; treatment of differential wage payments as compensation under certain circumstances.

With respect to the death of a member that occurs while the member is performing qualified military service within the meaning of Section 414(u) of the Internal Revenue Code:

The deceased member’s period of qualified military service must be counted for vesting purposes.

To the extent required by Section 401(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code, the deceased member’s survivors are entitled to any additional benefits that the system would provide if the member had resumed employment and then died, such as those purchase rights the deceased member could have exercised under Section 25-11-109(7).

To the extent required by Section 414(u)(12) of the Internal Revenue Code, a member receiving differential wage payments within the meaning of Section 3401(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code from an employer shall be treated as employed by that employer, and the differential wage payment shall be treated as compensation for purposes of applying the limits on an annual addition under Section 415(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. This provision shall be applied to all similarly situated individuals in a reasonably equivalent manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-11-111.
Superannuation retirement.

(1) Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least four (4) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member’s application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service.

Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attainment of the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, which shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member’s application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service.

(1) Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed four (4) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service. The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member’s application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service.

Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, whose withdrawal from service occurs before attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed eight (8) or more years of membership service and has not received a refund of his accumulated contributions, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, beginning upon his attaining the age of sixty (60) years, of the amount earned and accrued at the date of withdrawal from service. The retirement allowance shall begin on the first of the month following the date the member’s application for the allowance is received by the board, but in no event before withdrawal from service.

Any member in service who has qualified for retirement benefits may select any optional method of settlement of retirement benefits by notifying the Executive Director of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System in writing, on a form prescribed by the board, of the option he has selected and by naming the beneficiary of the option and furnishing necessary proof of age. The option, once selected, may be changed at any time before actual retirement or death, but upon the death or retirement of the member, the optional settlement shall be placed in effect upon proper notification to the executive director.

Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of:

A member’s annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and

An employer’s annuity, which, together with the member’s annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the average compensation for each year of service exceeding twenty-five (25) years of creditable service.

Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who was eligible to receive a retirement allowance before July 1, 1991, and who is still receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1992, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance of the retired member equal to one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) of the average compensation for each year of state service in excess of twenty-five (25) years of membership service up to and including thirty (30) years. The maximum increase shall be five-eighths of one percent (5/8 of 1%). In no case shall a member who has been retired before July 1, 1987, receive less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of creditable service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof. Persons retired on or after July 1, 1987, shall receive at least Ten Dollars ($10.00) per month for each year of service and proportionately for each quarter year thereof reduced for the option selected. However, such Ten Dollars ($10.00) minimum per month for each year of creditable service shall not apply to a retirement allowance computed under Section 25-11-114 based on a percentage of the member’s average compensation.

The board of trustees may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under this subsection.

Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, shall be entitled to an annual retirement allowance which shall consist of:

A member’s annuity, which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions of the member at the time of retirement computed according to the actuarial table in use by the system; and

An employer’s annuity, which, together with the member’s annuity provided above, shall be equal to two percent (2%) of the average compensation for each year of service up to and including thirty (30) years of creditable service, and two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of average compensation for each year of service exceeding thirty (30) years of creditable service.

Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, upon withdrawal from service upon or after attaining the age of sixty (60) years who has completed at least eight (8) years of membership service, or any such member upon withdrawal from service regardless of age who has completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section. In the case of the retirement of any member who has attained age sixty (60) but who has not completed at least thirty (30) years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the formula set forth in subsection (e) of this section except that the total annual retirement allowance shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent factor for each year of creditable service below thirty (30) years or the number of years in age that the member is below age sixty-five (65), whichever is less.

No member, except members excluded by the Age Discrimination in Employment Act Amendments of 1986 (Public Law 99-592), under either Article 1 or Article 3 in state service shall be required to retire because of age.

No payment on account of any benefit granted under the provisions of this section shall become effective or begin to accrue until January 1, 1953.

(1) A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the retirement system, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the retirement system to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled. The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi from any claim to the waived retirement benefits.

Any waiver under this subsection shall apply only to the person executing the waiver. A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement. However, a beneficiary may, at the option of the beneficiary, execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection.

The retirement system shall retain in the annuity reserve account amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-15; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 15; Laws, 1956, ch. 347; Laws, 1960, ch. 453, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 618, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 578, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 478, § 3; Laws, 1973, ch. 450, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 511; Laws, 1980, ch. 481, § 4; Laws, 1985, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 473; Laws, 1987, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-11-111.1.
Payment of retirement benefits by the most appropriate means as determined by the board.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall make payments of retirement benefits under this chapter to members and to the beneficiaries of those members, by whatever means the board prescribes by regulation to be the most appropriate for the proper and efficient payment of benefits, including, but not limited to, direct deposit to an account with a financial institution that is a participant of the Automated Clearing House designated by the member or beneficiary. The board may provide for alternative means of payment if the member or beneficiary can demonstrate that payment by the prescribed means will cause the member or beneficiary undue hardship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016.